Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.470

Publicity fund.

Every city of the second class may create a publicity fund to be used exclusively for exploiting and advertising the general advantages and opportunities of the city and its vicinity. After providing by ordinance for a publicity fund the city council may use therefor an annual amount not exceeding sixty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation of the taxable property in the city.

[ 1994 c 81 s 22; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 16; 1965 c 7 s 35.23.470. Prior: 1913 c 57 s 1; RRS s 9035.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.